src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc
!!TODO write comments

LEXICON Adv_Root !!TODO Alphabetize
man Adv_Tag "also" ;
gid Adv_Tag "very" ;
pa Adv_Tag "more, yet" ;
na Adv_Tag "already" ;
lang Adv_Tag "only" ;
lamang Adv_Tag "only" ;
daw Adv_Tag "like" ;
bisan Adv_Tag "even" ;
karon Adv_Tag "now, later" ;
dayon Adv_Tag "immediately" ;
naman Adv_Tag "again" ;
subong Adv_Tag "now, current" ;
samtang Adv_Tag "while" ;
liwat Adv_Tag "again" ;
anay Adv_Tag "first" ;

LEXICON Adv_Tag
+Adv: # ;
